Maryland, session 2026, HB0465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0465*

HOUSE BILL 465
5–809.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE BEHAVIOR” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 10–923 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) A PERSON ACTING IN GOOD FAITH MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR
DISCLOSING ANY INFORMATION ABOUT ALLEGATIONS OF SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE
BEHAVIOR TO ANOTHER PERSON.
(C) A PERSON WHO DISCLOSES INFORMATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PRESUMED TO HAVE ACTED IN GOOD FAITH UNLESS IT IS
SHOWN BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON:
(1) ACTED WITH ACTUAL MALICE TOWARD THE PERSON ALLEGED TO
HAVE COMMITTED SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE BEHAVIOR; OR
(2) INTENTIONALLY OR RECKLESSLY DISCLOSED FALSE
INFORMATION ABOUT THE PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE COMMITTED SEXUALLY
ASSAULTIVE BEHAVIOR.
(D) THE COURT SHALL AWARD REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS
TO A PERSON WHO SUCCESSFULLY DEFENDS A CLAIM THAT THE PERSON DID NOT
ACT IN GOOD FAITH IN DISCLOSING INFORMATION ABOUT ALLEGATIONS OF
SEXUALLY ASSAULTIVE BEHAVIOR, UNLESS THE PARTY FROM WHOM THE FEES AND
COSTS ARE SOUGHT ESTABLISHES THAT THE AWARD WOULD BE CLEARLY
INAPPROPRIATE.
10–923.
(a) In this section, “sexually assaultive behavior” means an act that would
constitute:
(1) A sexual crime under Title 3, Subtitle 3 of the Criminal Law Article;
(2) Sexual abuse of a minor under § 3–602 of the Criminal Law Article;
(3) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult under § 3–604 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(4) A violation of 18 U.S.C. Chapter 109A; or
(5) A violation of a law of another state, the United States, or a foreign
country that is equivalent to an offense under item (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection.

HOUSE BILL 465 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.